Nevada, session 83, SB79.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 501.356 is hereby amended to read as follows:
501.356 1. Money received by the Department from:
(a) The sale of licenses;
(b) Fees described in NRS 278.337;
(c) Fees pursuant to the provisions of NRS 488.075 and
488.1795;
(d) Remittances from the State Treasurer pursuant to the
provisions of NRS 365.535;
(e) Appropriations made by the Legislature; and
(f) All other sources, including, without limitation, the Federal
Government, except money derived from the forfeiture of any
property described in NRS 501.3857 or money deposited in the
Wildlife Heritage Account pursuant to NRS 501.3575, the Wildlife
Trust Fund pursuant to NRS 501.3585, the Energy Planning and
Conservation Account created by NRS 701.630 or the Account for
the Recovery of Costs created by NRS 701.640,
 must be deposited with the State Treasurer for credit to the
Wildlife Account in the State General Fund.
2. The interest and income earned on the money in the Wildlife
Account, after deducting any applicable charges, must be credited to
the Account.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4 and NRS
503.597, the Department may use money in the Wildlife Account
only to carry out the provisions of this title and chapter 488 of NRS
and as provided in NRS 365.535, and the money must not be
diverted to any other use.
4. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 502.250, 502.410 and
504.155, all fees for the sale or issuance of stamps, tags, permits and
licenses that are required to be deposited in the Wildlife Account
pursuant to the provisions of this title and any matching money
received by the Department from any source must be accounted for
separately and must be used:
(a) Only for the protection, propagation and management of
wildlife; and
(b) If the fee is for the sale or issuance of a license, permit or tag
other than a tag specified in subsection [5] 3 or [6] 4 of NRS
502.250, under the guidance of the Commission pursuant to
subsection 2 of NRS 501.181.
Sec. 2. NRS 502.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
502.010 1. A person who hunts or fishes any wildlife without
having first procured a license or permit to do so, as provided in this
title, is guilty of a misdemeanor, except that:
-
*SB79*

– 4 –
(a) A license to hunt or fish is not required of a [resident of this
State] child who is under 12 years of age, unless required for the
issuance of tags as prescribed in this title or by the regulations of the
Commission.
(b) [A license to fish is not required of a nonresident of this
State who is under 12 years of age, but the number of fish taken by
the nonresident must not exceed 50 percent of the daily creel and
possession limits as provided by law.
(c)] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6 or 7 of NRS
202.300 and NRS 502.066, it is unlawful for any child who is under
18 years of age to hunt any wildlife with any firearm, unless the
child is accompanied at all times by the child’s parent or guardian or
is accompanied at all times by an adult person authorized by the
child’s parent or guardian to have control or custody of the child to
hunt if the authorized person is also licensed to hunt.
[(d)] (c) A child who is under 12 years of age, whether
accompanied by a qualified person or not, shall not hunt big game in
the State of Nevada unless he or she participates in a program
established pursuant to NRS 502.104. This section does not prohibit
any child from accompanying an adult licensed to hunt.
[(e)] (d) The Commission may adopt regulations setting forth:
(1) The species of wildlife which may be hunted or trapped
without a license or permit; or
(2) The circumstances under which a person may fish
without a license, permit or stamp in a lake or pond that is located
entirely on private property and is stocked with lawfully acquired
fish.
[(f)] (e) The Commission may declare 1 day per year as a day
upon which persons may fish without a license to do so.
2. This section does not apply to the protection of persons or
property from unprotected wildlife on or in the immediate vicinity
of home or ranch premises.
Sec. 3. NRS 502.072 is hereby amended to read as follows:
502.072 The Department shall issue any license authorized
under the provisions of this chapter, upon payment of the applicable
fee prescribed by regulation and collected pursuant to NRS
502.240 and satisfactory proof, subject to the provisions of NRS
417.0187, of the requisite facts to any bona fide resident of the State
of Nevada who has incurred a service-connected disability which is
considered to be 50 percent or more by the Department of Veterans
Affairs and has received upon severance from service an honorable
discharge or certificate of satisfactory service from the Armed
Forces of the United States.
-
*SB79*

– 5 –
Sec. 4. NRS 502.103 is hereby amended to read as follows:
502.103 1. The Commission may adopt regulations
establishing:
(a) Conditions or events which are extenuating circumstances;
(b) A process through which a big game hunter who claims an
extenuating circumstance may provide documentation to the
Department which shows that his or her condition or event qualifies
as an extenuating circumstance;
(c) A program through which a big game hunter who has proven
that he or she qualifies for an extenuating circumstance pursuant to
paragraph (b) may:
(1) Transfer his or her tag to another person who is otherwise
eligible to hunt a big game mammal in this State;
(2) [Defer] If there will be an open season for the big game
mammal for which the tag was issued in the following year that is
identical to the current season, defer his or her use of the tag to the
next [applicable] open season; or
(3) Return his or her tag to the Department for restoration by
the Department of any bonus points that he or she used to obtain the
tag that is being returned; and
(d) A process through which a family member of a deceased big
game hunter may provide documentation to the Department of the
death of the big game hunter and transfer the tag of the deceased big
game hunter to another person who is otherwise eligible to hunt a
big game mammal in this State.
2. If a big game hunter transfers his or her tag to another
person pursuant to subparagraph (1) of paragraph (c) of subsection
1, the big game hunter may not charge a fee or receive any
compensation for such a transfer.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Big game hunter” means a person who holds a tag.
(b) “Extenuating circumstance” means any injury, illness or
other condition or event, as determined by the Commission, of a big
game hunter or a family member of a big game hunter that causes
the big game hunter to be unable to use his or her tag. The term
includes, without limitation, the death of the big game hunter.
(c) “Family member” means:
(1) A spouse of the big game hunter;
(2) A person who is related to the big game hunter within the
first degree of consanguinity; or
(3) A stepchild of the big game hunter.
(d) “Tag” means a tag to hunt a big game mammal in this State.
-
*SB79*

– 6 –
Sec. 5. NRS 502.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
502.110 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
[no] not more than one license of each class may be issued to any
one person during each licensing period.
2. The Commission shall adopt regulations providing for the
issuance of a duplicate license to replace an unexpired license that
has been lost, stolen , surrendered or destroyed. The regulations
must specify a fee, which must not exceed $10, for the issuance of a
duplicate license. A duplicate license has the same effect, and is
subject to the same conditions and restrictions, as the license it
replaces.
Sec. 6. NRS 502.142 is hereby amended to read as follows:
502.142 1. The Commission shall adopt regulations to
establish a program pursuant to which the Department will issue
special incentive elk tags. The regulations must:
(a) Set forth the application and annual review processes for the
issuance of special incentive elk tags.
(b) Require that an application for a special incentive elk tag
must be accompanied by:
(1) The fee [charged] for an elk tag prescribed by regulation
and collected pursuant to NRS 502.250; and
(2) Any administrative fee charged in connection with the
issuance of an elk tag pursuant to this chapter.
(c) Provide for the issuance of a special incentive elk tag only to
a person who:
(1) Lawfully owns, leases or manages private land within an
actual elk use area; and
(2) If that private land blocks reasonable access to adjacent
public land, provides reasonable access through the private land to
allow a person or hunting party possessing a valid elk tag to hunt elk
on the adjacent public land.
(d) Establish criteria for the issuance of special incentive elk
tags based upon:
(1) The number of elk using private land controlled by the
applicant;
(2) The number of days the elk use private lands of the
applicant in a calendar year;
(3) The total number of elk; and
(4) Limiting the number of special incentive elk tags issued
in each calendar year to not more than one-half of the bull elk tags
issued in that calendar year,
 within the actual elk use area in the unit or units of the
management area or areas in which the private land is located.
(e) Provide that special incentive elk tags are valid for both
sexes of elk.
-
*SB79*

– 7 –
(f) Prohibit a person who has, within a particular calendar year,
applied for or received compensation pursuant to NRS 504.165 as
reimbursement for damage caused by elk to private land from
applying, within the same calendar year, for a special incentive elk
tag for the same private land.
(g) Allow a group of owners, lessees and managers of private
land to qualify for a special incentive elk tag for their combined
lands.
(h) Ensure that the issuance of special incentive elk tags will not
result in the number of bull elk tags issued in any year being
reduced to a number below the quota for bull elk tags established by
the Commission for 1997.
(i) Provide that a person to whom a special incentive elk tag is
issued by the Commission pursuant to this section may:
(1) If the person holds a valid hunting license issued by this
State, use the special incentive elk tag himself or herself; or
(2) Sell the special incentive elk tag to another person who
holds a valid hunting license issued by this State at any price upon
which the parties mutually agree.
(j) Require that a person who is issued a special incentive elk tag
must hunt:
(1) During the open season for elk.
(2) In the unit or units within the management area or areas
in which the private land is located.
(k) Provide for the appointment of an arbitration panel to resolve
disputes between persons who apply for special incentive elk tags
and the Department regarding the issuance of such tags.
2. As used in this section, “actual elk use area” means an area
in which elk live, as identified and designated by the Department.
Sec. 7. NRS 502.145 is hereby amended to read as follows:
502.145 1. An owner, lessee or manager of private land in
this State may apply to the Department for the issuance to him or
her of one or more deer or antelope tags as provided in this section.
The tags must be issued as compensation for damage caused by deer
or antelope to the private land or to any improvements thereon.
2. An application made pursuant to this section must:
(a) Be made in the form prescribed by the Department;
(b) Establish to the satisfaction of the Department that the
applicant has sustained damage of the kind described in subsection
1; and
(c) Be accompanied by the fee [charged] for the tags prescribed
by regulation and collected pursuant to NRS 502.250 and any fee
charged for administrative costs.
3. The Department shall review the application, may conduct
any investigation it deems appropriate and, if it approves the
-
*SB79*

– 8 –
application, shall issue to the applicant not more than one tag for
each 50 animals present on the private land owned, leased or
managed by the applicant. Both deer and antelope tags may be
issued to an applicant.
4. A tag issued as compensation for damage pursuant to this
section:
(a) May be used by the owner, lessee or manager of the private
land if the owner, lessee or manager holds a valid Nevada hunting
license, or may be sold by that person to any holder of a valid
Nevada hunting license at any price mutually agreed upon;
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (2) of
paragraph (c), must be used on the private land or in the unit or units
within the management area or areas in which the private land is
located; and
(c) May only be used during:
(1) The open season for the species for which the tag is
issued; or
(2) A season prescribed by regulation of the Commission for
the use of such tags only on the private land.
5. As a condition of receiving a tag from the Department
pursuant to this section, an owner, lessee or manager who is
lawfully in control of private land that blocks access to adjacent
public land must provide access to the public land during the
hunting season to a person or hunting party with a tag for the
purpose of hunting on the public land.
6. Insofar as they are consistent with this section, the
provisions of this title and of the regulations adopted by the
Commission apply to the issuance and use of tags pursuant to this
section. The Commission:
(a) Shall by regulation establish the maximum number of tags
which may be issued annually by the Department pursuant to this
section, which must not exceed 2.5 percent of the total number of
deer and antelope tags which are authorized for issuance annually
throughout the State; and
(b) May adopt any other regulations it deems necessary to carry
out the provisions of this section.
Sec. 8. NRS 502.148 is hereby amended to read as follows:
502.148 1. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
any person who wishes to apply for a restricted nonresident deer tag
pursuant to NRS 502.147 must complete an application on a form
prescribed and furnished by the Department. A licensed master
guide may complete the application for an applicant. The
application must be signed by the applicant and the master guide
who will be responsible for conducting the restricted nonresident
deer hunt.
-
*SB79*

– 9 –
2. The application must be accompanied by [a] the fee [for the
tag of $300,] prescribed by regulation pursuant to NRS 502.250,
plus any other fees which the Department may require. The
Commission shall establish the time limits and acceptable methods
for submitting such applications to the Department.
3. Any application for a restricted nonresident deer tag which
contains an error or omission must be rejected and the fee for the tag
returned to the applicant.
4. A person who is issued a restricted nonresident deer tag is
not eligible to apply for any other deer tag issued in this State for the
same hunting season as that restricted nonresident deer hunt.
5. All fees collected pursuant to this section must be deposited
with the State Treasurer for credit to the Wildlife Account in the
State General Fund.
Sec. 9. NRS 502.215 is hereby amended to read as follows:
502.215 1. If any person who possesses a tag to hunt a big
game mammal kills an animal that is believed to be diseased and
unfit for human consumption, the person shall place his or her tag
on the carcass or validate the tag in accordance with NRS 502.150
and any regulations adopted by the Commission pursuant to NRS
502.160 and provide the whole carcass for inspection by an
authorized representative of the Department or, at the person’s own
expense, by a veterinarian licensed to practice in Nevada. Except as
otherwise provided in this subsection [,] or subsection 2, the holder
of the tag who provides the carcass for such an inspection is entitled,
if the carcass is diseased and unfit for human consumption, to
receive at no charge another tag as a replacement for the carcass
determined to be diseased and unfit for consumption. The holder
shall choose whether the replacement tag is to be issued for the
current hunting season or for the next similar season in the
following year. If the holder chooses to retain the head, antlers,
carcass, horns or hide of the animal, and the authorized
representative of the Department approves the retention, the holder
shall be deemed to waive any claim the holder may have had for the
issuance of a replacement tag.
2. A person who provides the carcass of a deer which is
infected with chronic wasting disease for inspection is not entitled
to a replacement tag issued pursuant to subsection 1.
3. A replacement tag issued pursuant to subsection 1 for the
current hunting season is valid for:
(a) The entire remaining portion of the season for which the
original tag was issued; or
(b) If the original tag was issued for a period of a split season,
the entire remaining portion of the period for which the original tag
was issued or the entire following period, if any.
-
*SB79*

– 10 –
[3.] 4. A replacement tag issued pursuant to subsection 1 must
be:
(a) Issued for the same unit for which the original tag was
issued.
(b) Used in the same manner as or pursuant to the same
conditions or restrictions applicable to the original tag.
[4.] 5. The Commission shall adopt by regulation:
(a) A procedure for the inspection and verification of the
condition of such a carcass;
(b) Requirements for the disposal of such a carcass if it is
determined to be diseased and unfit for human consumption;
(c) Requirements for the disposition of the hide and the antlers
or horns of the animal; and
(d) Except as otherwise provided in [subsection] subsections 2
[,] and 3, a procedure for the issuance of a replacement tag pursuant
to this section.
[5.] 6. For the purposes of this section, “split season” means a
season which is divided into two or more periods.
Sec. 10. NRS 502.240 is hereby amended to read as follows:
502.240 1. The Department shall issue:
(a) Resident licenses and limited permits pursuant to this section
to any person who is a resident of this State pursuant to
NRS 502.015.
(b) Nonresident licenses and limited permits pursuant to this
section to any person who does not qualify as a resident of this State
pursuant to NRS 502.015.
2. A limited permit issued pursuant to this section must be for
1 or more consecutive calendar days in accordance with the term
of the permit prescribed by the Commission pursuant to
NRS 502.030.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 504.390, the
Department shall issue [a license] the following licenses or [permit]
limited permits to any person who is 18 years or older upon the
payment of the [following] applicable fee prescribed by the
Commission pursuant to subsection 8 for:
(a) Fishing:
(1) A resident annual fishing license . [ ............................ $40]
(2) A resident [1-day] limited permit to fish . [ ..................... 9
Each consecutive day added to a resident 1-day
permit to fish ..................................................................... 3
A]
(3) A nonresident annual fishing license.
(4) A nonresident annual license to fish solely in the
reciprocal waters of the Colorado River, Lake Mead, Lake Mojave,
Lake Tahoe and Topaz Lake.
-
*SB79*

– 11 –
(5) A nonresident limited permit to fish.
(b) Hunting, a resident annual hunting license . [ ................... 38]
(c) A combination of hunting and fishing:
(1) A resident annual combination hunting and
fishing license . [ ............................................................................ 75]
(2) A nonresident annual combination hunting and fishing
license.
(3) A nonresident limited combination permit to fish and
hunt upland game birds and migratory game birds.
(d) Trapping:
(1) A resident trapping license . [ ....................................... 40]
(2) A nonresident trapping license.
(e) Fur dealing:
(1) A resident fur dealer’s license . [ .................................. 63]
(2) A nonresident fur dealer’s license.
(f) Guiding:
(1) A resident master guide’s license . [ ........................... 750]
(2) A resident subguide’s license . [ .................................. 125
A nonresident annual fishing license .................................... 80
A nonresident annual license to fish solely in the
reciprocal waters of the Colorado River, Lake
Mead, Lake Mojave, Lake Tahoe and Topaz
Lake ................................................................................. 30
A nonresident 1-day permit to fish ....................................... 18
Each consecutive day added to a nonresident 1-
day permit to fish .............................................................. 7
A nonresident annual combination hunting and
fishing license ................................................................ 155
A nonresident trapping license ........................................... 188
A nonresident fur dealer’s license ..................................... 125]
(3) A nonresident master guide’s license . [ .................. 1,500]
(4) A nonresident subguide’s license . [ ............................ 250
A nonresident 1-day combination permit to fish
and hunt upland game birds and migratory
game birds ....................................................................... 23
Each consecutive day added to a nonresident 1-
day combination permit to fish and hunt
upland game birds and migratory game birds ................... 8
3.] 4. The Department shall issue [a license] the following
licenses to any person who is at least 12 years of age but less than
18 years of age upon payment of the [following] applicable fee
[for:] prescribed by the Commission pursuant to subsection 8:
(a) A resident youth combination hunting and
fishing license . [ .......................................................................... $15]
(b) A resident youth trapping license . [ .................................. 15]
-
*SB79*

– 12 –
(c) A nonresident youth combination hunting and
fishing license . [ ............................................................................ 15]
[4.] 5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection [5,] 6, the
Department shall issue an annual resident specialty combination
hunting and fishing license pursuant to this chapter upon satisfactory
proof of the requisite facts and the payment of a fee [of $15]
prescribed by the Commission pursuant to subsection 8 to:
(a) Any person who has been considered to be a resident of this
State pursuant to NRS 502.015 immediately preceding the date of
application for the license and is 65 years of age or older.
(b) Any person who is a resident of this State pursuant to NRS
502.015 and who has a severe physical disability.
(c) Any person who is a resident of this State pursuant to NRS
502.015 and who has incurred a service-connected disability
specified in NRS 502.072.
[5.] 6. The Department shall issue an annual resident specialty
combination hunting and fishing license pursuant to this chapter
upon satisfactory proof of the requisite facts and the payment of a
fee [of $10] prescribed by the Commission pursuant to subsection
8 to any resident Native American of this State pursuant to
NRS 502.280.
[6.] 7. The Department shall issue to any person, without
regard to residence, upon the payment of [a] the applicable fee [of:
For a] prescribed by the Commission pursuant to
subsection 8:
(a) A noncommercial license for the possession of
live wildlife . [ ............................................................................... $15
For a]
(b) A commercial or private shooting preserve . [ .................. 125
For a]
(c) A commercial license for the possession of live
wildlife . [ ...................................................................................... 500
For a]
(d) A live bait dealer’s permit . [............................................... 44
For a]
(e) A competitive field trials permit . [ ..................................... 31
For a]
(f) A permit to train dogs or falcons . [ ..................................... 15
For a]
(g) A 1-year falconry license . [ ................................................ 38
For a]
(h) A 3-year falconry license . [ ................................................ 94
For an]
(i) An importation permit . [ ..................................................... 15
For an]
-
*SB79*

– 13 –
(j) An import eligibility permit . [ ............................................. 31
For an]
(k) An exportation permit . [ ..................................................... 15
For any]
(l) Any other special permit . [issued by the Department, a fee
not to exceed the highest fee established for any other special permit
set by the Commission.
7.] 8. The Commission shall prescribe by regulation
reasonable initial fees for the licenses and permits described in
this section. The initial fees prescribed by the Commission must be
equal to the fees established in this section or prescribed by
regulation, as applicable, as such fees existed on the day before
the effective date of this act.
9. After the Commission prescribes the initial fees pursuant
to subsection 8, the Commission may increase or decrease a fee in
an amount rounded to the nearest whole dollar that is not less
than 90 percent and not more than 125 percent of the amount
calculated by adding the current fee to the product of the current
fee multiplied by the percentage increase or decrease in the
annual average consumer price inflation index from:
(a) For the first adjustment of the fee, the year in which the fee
was established in statute or regulation, as applicable, and the
calendar year immediately preceding the year in which the
adjustment is made; and
(b) For all adjustments of the fee after the first adjustment, the
calendar year immediately preceding the year in which the
previous adjustment was made and the calendar year immediately
preceding the year in which the current adjustment is made.
10. As used in this section [, “severe] :
(a) “Consumer price inflation index” means the Consumer
Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items) as
published by the United States Department of Labor or, if that
index ceases to be published by the United States Department of
Labor, the published index selected by the Department of Taxation
pursuant to subsection 11 of NRS 361.091.
(b) “Severe physical disability” means a physical disability
which materially limits a person’s ability to engage in gainful
employment.
Sec. 11. NRS 502.242 is hereby amended to read as follows:
502.242 1. On or before August 30 of each year, an amount
of money which is equal to 5.25 percent of the fees [charged]
prescribed by regulation and collected pursuant to NRS 502.240
during the immediately preceding fiscal year for hunting, trapping,
fishing or combination hunting and fishing licenses or limited
permits [pursuant to NRS 502.240] must be accounted for
-
*SB79*

– 14 –
separately, deposited with the State Treasurer for credit to the
Wildlife Account and, except as otherwise provided in this
subsection and NRS 502.294 and 502.310, used by the Department
for the purposes of wildlife habitat rehabilitation and restoration.
Each year, not more than 18 percent of the money credited to the
Wildlife Account from any revenue received pursuant to this
subsection may be used to monitor wildlife and its habitat for those
purposes.
2. The money in the Wildlife Account credited pursuant to this
section remains in the Account and does not revert to the State
General Fund at the end of any fiscal year.
Sec. 12. NRS 502.250 is hereby amended to read as follows:
502.250 1. The [amount of the fee that must be charged]
Commission shall prescribe by regulation reasonable initial fees,
which must be equal to the fees established in this section or
prescribed by regulation, as applicable, as such fees existed on the
day before the effective date of this act, for the following tags [is:] :
(a) Resident deer tag . [.......................................................... $30]
(b) Resident antelope with horns shorter than its
ears tag . [ ...................................................................................... 60]
(c) Resident antelope with horns longer than its ears tag.
(d) Resident antlered elk tag . [ ............................................. 120]
(e) Resident antlerless elk tag.
(f) Resident spike tag.
(g) Resident ewe bighorn sheep tag . [ ................................... 120]
(h) Resident ram bighorn sheep tag.
(i) Resident mountain goat tag . [ .......................................... 120]
(j) Resident mountain lion tag . [ ............................................. 25]
(k) Resident black bear tag.
(l) Resident moose tag.
(m) Resident turkey tag.
(n) Nonresident deer tag . [ .................................................... 240]
(o) Restricted nonresident deer tag.
(p) Nonresident antelope with horns shorter than
its ears tag . [................................................................................ 300]
(q) Nonresident antelope with horns longer than its ears tag.
(r) Nonresident antlered elk tag . [ ...................................... 1,200]
(s) Nonresident antlerless elk tag . [ ...................................... 500]
(t) Nonresident ewe bighorn sheep tag . [ ........................... 1,200]
(u) Nonresident ram bighorn sheep tag.
(v) Nonresident mountain goat tag . [ ................................. 1,200]
(w) Nonresident mountain lion tag . [ .................................... 100]
(x) Nonresident black bear tag.
(y) Nonresident moose tag.
(z) Nonresident turkey tag.
-
*SB79*

– 15 –
2. [The amount of the fee for other resident or nonresident big
game tags must not exceed the highest fee for a resident or
nonresident big game tag established pursuant to this section.
3. The amount of the fee for a tag determined to be necessary
by the Commission for other species pursuant to NRS 502.130 must
not exceed the highest fee for a resident or nonresident tag
established pursuant to this section.
4.] A fee not to exceed $10 may be charged for processing an
application for a game species or permit other than an application
for an elk. A fee of not less than $5 but not more than $15 must be
charged for processing an application for an elk, $5 of which must
be deposited with the State Treasurer for credit to the Wildlife
Account in the State General Fund and used for the prevention and
mitigation of damage caused by elk or game mammals not native to
this State. A fee of not less than $15 and not more than $50 must be
charged for processing an application for a Silver State Tag.
[5.] 3. The Commission may accept sealed bids for, or award
through an auction or a Silver State Tag Drawing, or any
combination thereof, not more than 15 big game tags and not more
than 5 wild turkey tags each year. To reimburse the Department for
the cost of managing wildlife and administering and conducting the
bid, auction or Silver State Tag Drawing, not more than 18 percent
of the total amount of money received from the bid, auction or
Silver State Tag Drawing may be deposited with the State Treasurer
for credit to the Wildlife Account in the State General Fund. Any
amount of money received from the bid, auction or Silver State Tag
Drawing that is not so deposited must be deposited with the State
Treasurer for credit to the Wildlife Heritage Account in the State
General Fund in accordance with the provisions of NRS 501.3575.
[6.] 4. The Commission may by regulation establish an
additional drawing for big game tags, which may be entitled the
Partnership in Wildlife Drawing. To reimburse the Department for
the cost of managing wildlife and administering and conducting the
drawing, not more than 18 percent of the total amount of money
received from the drawing may be deposited with the State
Treasurer for credit to the Wildlife Account in the State General
Fund. Except as otherwise provided by regulations adopted by the
Commission pursuant to subsection [7,] 5, the money received by
the Department from applicants in the drawing who are not awarded
big game tags must be deposited with the State Treasurer for credit
to the Wildlife Heritage Account in accordance with the provisions
of NRS 501.3575.
[7.] 5. The Commission may adopt regulations which
authorize the return of all or a portion of any fee collected from a
person pursuant to the provisions of this section.
-
*SB79*

– 16 –
6. After the Commission prescribes the initial fees pursuant
to subsection 1, the Commission may increase or decrease a fee in
an amount rounded to the nearest whole dollar that is not less
than 90 percent and not more than 125 percent of the amount
calculated by adding the current fee to the product of the current
fee multiplied by the percentage increase or decrease in the
annual average consumer price inflation index from:
(a) For the first adjustment of the fee, the year in which the fee
was established in statute or regulation, as applicable, and the
calendar year immediately preceding the year for which the
adjustment is made; and
(b) For all adjustments of the fee after the first adjustment, the
calendar year immediately preceding the year in which the
previous adjustment was made and the calendar year immediately
preceding the year in which the current adjustment is made.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Antelope with horns longer than its ears” means any
pronghorn antelope having at least one horn that is longer than
either ear of the antelope.
(b) “Antelope with horns shorter than its ears” means any
pronghorn antelope without horns or with both horns that are
shorter than its ears.
(c) “Consumer price inflation index” means the Consumer
Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items) as
published by the United States Department of Labor or, if that
index ceases to be published by the United States Department of
Labor, the published index selected by the Department of Taxation
pursuant to subsection 11 of NRS 361.091.
Sec. 13. NRS 502.253 is hereby amended to read as follows:
502.253 1. In addition to any fee [charged] prescribed by
regulation and collected pursuant to NRS 502.250, a fee of $3 must
be charged for processing each application for a game tag, the
revenue from which must be accounted for separately, deposited
with the State Treasurer for credit to the Wildlife Account in the
State General Fund and used by the Department, at the direction of
the applicant, for costs related to:
(a) Developing and implementing an annual program for the
lethal removal of predatory wildlife; or
(b) Developing and implementing an annual program for the
improvement of wildlife habitat and research or management
activities beneficial to nonpredatory game species.
2. The Department of Wildlife is hereby authorized to expend a
portion of the money collected pursuant to subsection 1 to enable
the State Department of Agriculture to develop and carry out the
programs described in subsection 1.
-
*SB79*

– 17 –
3. Any program developed or wildlife management activity or
research conducted pursuant to this section must be developed or
conducted under the guidance of the Commission in accordance
with the provisions of subsection 4 and the policies adopted by the
Commission pursuant to NRS 501.181.
4. The Department, in adopting any program for the lethal
removal of predatory wildlife developed pursuant to this section,
shall first consider the recommendations of the Commission and the
State Predatory Animal and Rodent Committee created by
NRS 567.020.
5. The money in the Wildlife Account credited pursuant to this
section remains in the Account and does not revert to the State
General Fund at the end of any fiscal year.
Sec. 14. NRS 502.280 is hereby amended to read as follows:
502.280 1. Any resident Native American of the State of
Nevada may apply for a specialty combination fishing and hunting
license. When applying for a specialty combination fishing and
hunting license, the resident Native American shall exhibit a
document issued in this State by the chair of a tribal council or chief
of a Native American tribe, or an officer of a reservation, colony or
educational institution, stating that the bearer is a resident Native
American of the State of Nevada.
2. The Department shall issue a specialty combination fishing
and hunting license to a resident Native American pursuant to
subsection [5] 6 of NRS 502.240 pursuant to the same methods as
the Department issues a specialty combination fishing and hunting
license to a person pursuant to subsection [4] 5 of NRS 502.240.
3. Before hunting for deer or big game off an Indian
reservation in this State, all Native Americans must secure resident
deer tags or other resident big game tags and pay the fee [provided
therefor in] prescribed by regulation and collected pursuant to
NRS 502.250.
4. If the Department is considering whether to make any
recommendations for proposed legislation relating to any fishing
and hunting rights of a resident Native American or any Native
American tribe in this State, the Department shall, in accordance
with regulations adopted by the Commission:
(a) Provide notice of the proposed action to each of those tribes
or any other person specified in those regulations; and
(b) Consult with each of those tribes and persons concerning the
proposed action.
5. Upon request by the Department, the Department of Native
American Affairs may provide information or assistance to the
Department in carrying out the provisions of this section.
-
*SB79*

– 18 –
6. The Commission shall adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of this section.
Sec. 15. NRS 502.294 is hereby amended to read as follows:
502.294 On or before August 30 of each year, an amount of
money which is equal to 3.5 percent of the fees [charged] prescribed
by regulation and collected pursuant to NRS 502.240 during the
immediately preceding fiscal year for hunting, fishing or
combination hunting and fishing licenses or limited permits
[pursuant to NRS 502.240] must be deposited with the State
Treasurer for credit to the Wildlife Account in the State General
Fund. The Department shall maintain separate accounting records
for the receipt and expenditure of that money. An amount not to
exceed 10 percent of that money may be used to reimburse the
Department for the cost of administering any project approved
pursuant to NRS 502.296. This amount is in addition to
compensation allowed persons authorized to issue and sell licenses.
Sec. 16. NRS 502.310 is hereby amended to read as follows:
502.310 On or before August 30 of each year, an amount of
money which is equal to 1 percent of the fees [charged] prescribed
by regulation and collected pursuant to NRS 502.240 during the
immediately preceding fiscal year for hunting, fishing or
combination hunting and fishing licenses or limited permits
[pursuant to NRS 502.240] must be deposited with the State
Treasurer for credit to the Wildlife Account in the State General
Fund. The Department shall maintain separate accounting records
for the receipt and expenditure of that money. An amount not to
exceed 10 percent of that money may be used to reimburse the
Department for the cost of administering any projects for waterfowl
approved pursuant to NRS 502.322. This amount is in addition to
compensation allowed persons authorized to issue and sell licenses.
Sec. 17. NRS 502.3262 is hereby amended to read as follows:
502.3262 On or before August 30 of each year, an amount of
money which is equal to 8.5 percent of the fees [charged] prescribed
by regulation and collected pursuant to NRS 502.240 during the
immediately preceding fiscal year for hunting, fishing or
combination hunting and fishing licenses or limited permits
[pursuant to NRS 502.240] must be deposited with the State
Treasurer for credit to the Wildlife Account in the State General
Fund. The Department shall maintain separate accounting records
for the receipt and expenditure of that money. An amount not to
exceed 10 percent of that money may be used to reimburse the
Department for the cost of administering the trout program and any
purpose specified in NRS 502.3264. This amount is in addition to
the compensation allowed persons authorized to issue and sell
licenses.
-
*SB79*

– 19 –
Sec. 18. NRS 502.400 is hereby amended to read as follows:
502.400 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, it is
unlawful for any person to hunt in the Carson Lake Wildlife
Management Area unless, at the time of entry and while hunting, the
person carries upon his or her person:
(a) An unexpired permit issued for that purpose on a form
specified by the Department; or
(b) Any other documentation specified by the Department as
proof that the person has paid to the Department, for the period of
licensing that includes the time the person is hunting, a fee that is
equal to the amount of the fee required pursuant to subsection 4 for
a seasonal permit or daily permit, as appropriate.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to a person
under 16 years of age who is accompanied by a person who is
carrying upon his or her person the permit or documentation
required pursuant to subsection 1.
3. A permit issued pursuant to subsection 1 may be sold only
by the Department or a person designated by the Department.
4. The Department shall charge and collect the following fees
for issuing a permit pursuant to subsection 1:
(a) Sixty dollars for a seasonal permit, the effective dates of
which must, as determined by the Department, coincide with the
license to hunt of the person purchasing the permit.
(b) Fifteen dollars for a daily permit. The Department shall not
make a daily permit specified in this paragraph available for
purchase before the second Monday of the open season for ducks.
5. The fee required pursuant to subsection 4 is in addition to
any fee required for a license or permit to hunt which is prescribed
by regulation and collected pursuant to NRS 502.240.
Sec. 19. NRS 503.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
503.200 1. The Department is empowered to authorize, under
permit and for such fee as may be [provided in] prescribed by
regulation and collected pursuant to NRS 502.240, competitive
field trials for hunting dogs or competitive field trials for falconry.
The Commission shall prescribe the rules and regulations to be
followed by those in charge of such trials insofar as conduct of the
field trials has any effect or bearing upon wildlife and the laws of
this State respecting closed and open seasons.
2. For the purpose of permitting such field trials, the
Department may authorize shooting of legally acquired upland game
birds during any closed season on the species of bird or birds to be
hunted.
3. All legally acquired upland game birds used in a field trial or
for the purpose of training hunting dogs and for falconry training
must be banded with legbands by the person in charge of such field
-
*SB79*

– 20 –
trial or training. Such birds may only be released in an area first
approved by the Department, after which the Department shall
authorize, under permit and under such rules and regulations as the
Commission may prescribe, the releasing of such legally acquired
upland game birds for the foregoing purposes.
4. All birds killed under the provisions of this section must be
accompanied by a receipt, giving the permit number, the date, the
name of the person in possession, and signed by the permit holder.
Birds killed and accompanied by a receipt under the provisions of
this section may be legally possessed.
Sec. 20. NRS 503.310 is hereby amended to read as follows:
503.310 1. The Commission may regulate or prohibit the use
of live bait in fishing so that no undesirable species are introduced
into the public waters of this State.
2. Any person engaged in the sale of live bait must first obtain
a permit from the Department for the fee [provided in] prescribed by
regulation and collected pursuant to NRS 502.240. The permit
may be revoked for any violation of regulations.
3. The Commission may prescribe the species which may be
held or sold by the permittee.
Sec. 21. NRS 503.583 is hereby amended to read as follows:
503.583 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, any
person who practices falconry or trains birds of prey must obtain a
falconry license from the Department upon payment of a license fee
[as provided in] prescribed by regulation and collected pursuant to
NRS 502.240.
2. The licensee, under permit, may obtain from the wild only
two birds per year. All such birds of prey must be banded in
accordance with regulations adopted by the Commission.
3. Birds of prey may not be taken, captured or disturbed during
the months in which they breed.
4. This section does not prohibit the capture or killing of a
hawk or an owl by holders of scientific collecting permits.
5. The Commission may adopt regulations authorizing a person
to practice falconry or train birds of prey without obtaining a
falconry license pursuant to the provisions of subsection 1.
Sec. 22. NRS 504.310 is hereby amended to read as follows:
504.310 1. Before being entitled to the benefits of any
commercial or private shooting preserve, the owner or proprietor
thereof must make application to the Department. The application
must set forth:
(a) The name and location of the shooting preserve.
(b) A legal description of the area included in the preserve.
(c) A statement whether the preserve is to be a commercial or
private preserve.
-
*SB79*

– 21 –
(d) If the application is for a commercial shooting preserve, a
statement of fees that are to be collected for the privilege of
shooting on the preserve.
2. If, after investigation, the Department is satisfied that the
tract is suitable for the purpose, and that the establishment of such a
preserve will not conflict with the public interest, the Department
may issue a commercial or private shooting preserve license upon
the payment of a license fee [as provided in] prescribed by
regulation and collected pursuant to NRS 502.240.
Sec. 23. NRS 504.390 is hereby amended to read as follows:
504.390 1. As used in this section, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(a) “Compensation” means any remuneration given in exchange
for providing guide service which is predicated on a business
relationship between the parties. The term does not include any
reimbursement for shared trip expenses, including, without
limitation, expenses for gasoline, food or any other costs that are
generally associated with persons who are engaging in recreational
hunting or fishing together.
(b) “Guide” means to assist another person for compensation in
hunting wild mammals or wild birds and fishing and includes the
transporting of another person or the person’s equipment to hunting
and fishing locations within a general hunting and fishing area
whether or not the guide determines the destination or course of
travel.
2. Each person who provides guide service for compensation or
provides guide service as an incidental service to customers of any
commercial enterprise, whether a direct fee is charged for the guide
service or not, must obtain a master guide license from the
Department. Such a license must not be issued to any person who
has not reached 21 years of age.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, each person
who assists a person who is required to have a master guide license
and acts as a guide in the course of that activity must obtain a
subguide license from the Department. Such a license must not be
issued to any person who has not reached 18 years of age. The
provisions of this subsection do not apply to a person who:
(a) Is employed by or assists a person who holds a master guide
license solely for the purpose of cooking, cutting wood, caring for,
grooming or saddling livestock, or transporting a person by motor
vehicle to or from a public facility for transportation, including,
without limitation, a public airport.
(b) Holds a master guide license which authorizes the person to
provide services for the same species and in the same areas as the
guide who employs him or her or requests the person’s assistance
-
*SB79*

– 22 –
and has submitted to the Department a notarized statement which
indicates that the person is employed by or provides assistance to
the guide. The statement must be signed by both guides.
4. Fees for master guide and subguide licenses must be [as
provided in] prescribed by regulation and collected pursuant to
NRS 502.240.
5. Any person who desires a master guide license must apply
for the license on a form prescribed and furnished by the
Department. The application must contain the social security
number of the applicant and such other information as the
Commission may require by regulation. If that person was not
licensed as a master guide during the previous licensing year, the
person’s application must be accompanied by a nonrefundable fee of
$1,500.
6. Any person who desires a subguide license must apply for
the license on a form prescribed and furnished by the Department. If
that person was not licensed as a subguide during the previous
licensing year, the person’s application must be accompanied by a
nonrefundable fee of $50.
7. It is unlawful for the holder of a master guide license to
operate in any area where a special use permit is required without
first obtaining a permit unless the holder is employed by or
providing assistance to a guide pursuant to subsection 3.
8. The holder of a master guide license shall maintain records
of the number of hunters and anglers served, and any other
information which the Department may require concerning fish and
game taken by such persons. The information must be furnished to
the Department on request.
9. If any licensee under this section, or person served by a
licensee, is convicted of a violation of any provision of this title or
chapter 488 of NRS, the Commission may revoke the license of the
licensee and may refuse issuance of another license to the licensee
for a period not to exceed 5 years.
10. The Commission may adopt regulations covering the
conduct and operation of a guide service.
11. The Department may issue master guide and subguide
licenses that are valid only in certain management areas,
management units or administrative regions in such a manner as
may be determined by the regulations of the Commission.
Sec. 24. Notwithstanding the amendatory provisions of this
act, the fees set forth in NRS 502.148, 502.240 and 502.250, as
those sections existed on the day before the effective date of this act,
remain in effect until the regulations establishing fees pursuant to
NRS 502.240 and 502.250, as amended by sections 10 and 12 of
-
*SB79*

– 23 –
this act, respectively, are adopted by the Board of Wildlife
Commissioners and filed with the Secretary of State.
Sec. 25. This act becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
H
-
*SB79*